Massachusetts, session 194th, H3810.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90, Section 22b subsection (a) of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection at the end
thereof:
No “low-boy automobile transporter” or “automobile transporter”, as defined by
Massachusetts General Law, section 1 of Chapter 90, shall load or alight any motor vehicles for
delivery or transport to a dealer, as defined by section 1 of chapter 90, on any public way in the
commonwealth.
A violation of this section shall be cause for revocation of the common carrier permit
issued under chapter 159b section 4 and certificates authorizing operations of common carriers
of 2

issued under chapter 159b section 3 and the operator subject to penalties subject to section 22b
subsection A of chapter 90.
of 2